Utah statutes.
58-54-6.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  Each license issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule. A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.

(2)  At the time of renewal, licensees shall show satisfactory evidence of each of the following renewal requirements:

(a)  16 hours of approved professional education during a two-year period, defined by rule, before renewal of a radiology technologist license.

(b)  10 hours of approved professional education during a two-year period, defined by rule, before renewal of a radiology practical technician license.

(3)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

